bg-BG: Разновидност на сметана за кафе: Течност; Без млечни продукти; На прах; Други
it: Varietà di preparato per crema caffè: Liquido; Non caseario; In polvere; Altro
pt-PT: Variedade de natas/creme para café: Líquido; Não lácteo; Em pó; Outro
zh-TW: 咖啡奶精種類: 液態; 非乳製; 粉狀; 其他
nl: Koffieroomvariant: Vloeistof; Zuivelvrij; Gepoederd; Andere
fi: Kahvikermavalikoima: Nestemäinen; Maidoton; Jauhettu; Muu
el: Ποικιλία κρέμας καφέ: Υγρό; Μη γαλακτοκομική; Σε σκόνη; Άλλο
sk-SK: Druhy smotany do kávy: Kvapalina; Nemliečny; Práškový; Iné
ru: Тип сливок для кофе: Жидкий; Без молока; Порошковый; Другое
lt-LT: Grietinėlės kavai rūšis: Skysta; Augalinė; Milteliai; Kita
fr: Variété de crème pour café: Liquide; Sans-lactose; En poudre; Autre
pl: Odmiana śmietanki do kawy: Płyn; Roślinne; Sproszkowane; Inne
zh-CN: 咖啡奶精品种: 液体; 非乳制品; 粉状; 其他
hu: Kávékrémpor fajtája: Folyékony; Nem tejalapú; Por alakú; Egyéb
nb: Kaffefløtevariant: Væske; Laktosefri; Puddret; Annet
en: Coffee creamer variety: Liquid; Non-dairy; Powdered; Other
ko: 커피 크리머 종류: 액상; 비유제품; 분말; 기타
hr-HR: Varijanta vrhnja za kavu: Tekućina; Nemliječno; U prahu; Ostalo
pt-BR: Variedade de creme de café: Líquido; Sem lactose; Em pó; Outro
ro-RO: Sortiment de cremă pentru cafea: Lichid; Vegetal; Pulbere; Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta smetane za kavo: Tekočina; Brez mleka; V prahu; Drugo
ja: コーヒークリーマー各種: リキッド; 乳製品不使用; 粉末; その他
th: ลักษณะครีมเทียม: แบบเหลว; ครีมเทียม; แบบผง; อื่นๆ
es: Variedad de leche para café: Líquido; No lácteo; En polvo; Otros
cs: Druh smetany do kávy: Kapalina; Rostlinná; Práškové; Jiné
da: Variant af kaffefløde: Væske; Uden mælkeprodukter; Pulveriseret; Andet
vi: Loại kem pha cà phê: Liquid; Không chứa sữa; Dạng bột; Khác
tr: Kahve Kreması Çeşitleri: Sıvı; Süt ürünü olmayan; Toz haline getirilmiş; Diğer
de: Auswahl an Kaffeeweißer: Flüssig; Non-Dairy; Pulvrig; Sonstiges
sv: Kaffecreamer sort: Vätska; Mjölkfri; Pulveriserad; Övrigt